Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 32 WATER AND SEWER DISTRICTS
§ 42-3218. Inclusion of property petitioned — Hearing — Order — Annexation of property petitioned — Hearing — Order — Annexation of property by election — Election procedure.

The boundaries of any district organized under the provisions of this chapter may be changed in the manner herein prescribed, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever; nor shall it affect or impair or discharge any contract, obligation, lien or charge for or upon which it might be liable or chargeable had any such change of boundaries not been made.

The owners of real property may file with the board a petition, in writing, praying that such real property be included in the district. The petition shall describe the property owned by the petitioners, and such petition shall be deemed to give assent of the petitioners to the inclusion in said district of the property described in the petition, and shall be accompanied by a reasonable filing fee in an amount to be determined by the board. Such petition must be acknowledged in the same manner that conveyances of land are required to be acknowledged. The secretary of the board shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be given and published in the county in which the property is situated, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, names of petitioners, descriptions of lands mentioned and the prayer of such petitioners; giving notice to all persons interested to appear at the office of the board at the time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The board shall at the time and place mentioned or at such time or times to which the hearing may be adjourned, proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any person to show cause in writing shall be deemed as an assent on his part to the inclusion of such lands in the district as prayed in the petition. If the petition is granted, the board shall make an order to that effect and, upon approval of said order, the property shall be included in the district.

The territory adjoining or in close proximity to and in the same county with any district created under the provisions of this chapter may be annexed to the district by either of the following procedures: (1) A petition for annexation of real property described in such petition, which has been signed by the owners of not less than sixty percent (60%) of the area in land within the territory to be annexed, and which contains the separate property descriptions of such petitioners, and which is acknowledged in the same manner that conveyances of land are required to be acknowledged, accompanied by a reasonable filing fee in an amount to be determined by the board, may be filed with the board. Upon filing with the board of such a petition, the secretary of the board shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be given and published in the county in which the property is situated, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, names of petitioners, descriptions of lands mentioned and the prayer of such petitioners; giving notice to all persons interested, including the staff and employees of said district and anyone designated by said district, to appear at the office of the board at the time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The board shall at the time and place mentioned or at such time or times to which the hearing may be adjourned, proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause why said petition shall not be granted. The failure of any person to show cause in writing shall be deemed as an assent to the annexation of such lands into the district as prayed in the petition. The board shall have full discretion to determine if the petition shall be granted. If the petition is granted, the board shall make an order to that effect. (2) Upon filing with the board of a petition signed by registered voters owning real property residing in the territory to be annexed, who constitute at least twenty percent (20%) of the taxpayers in such territory, praying for an election to determine if annexation shall be made of property designated in such petition, together with payment of a reasonable filing fee in an amount to be determined by the board, the board shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be given and published in the county in which the property is situated, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, names of petitioners, descriptions of lands to be annexed and the prayer of such petition; giving notice to all persons interested, including the staff and employees of said district and anyone designated by said district to appear at the office of the board at the time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition shall not be granted. The board shall at the time and place mentioned or at such time or times to which the hearing may be adjourned, proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause why said petition shall not be granted. The board shall have full discretion to determine if the petition shall be granted, and if such petition is granted, the board shall direct that an election be held, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code. The election shall be conducted in the same manner as general elections in this state, except that the board shall establish as many voting places within such territory proposed to be annexed as are by the board deemed necessary and shall define the boundaries of such voting places. The board shall appoint three (3) judges of election for each voting place, one (1) of whom shall be designated by the board to be the clerk of such election precinct. Each elector shall be registered as required by the general election laws and shall have resided within the area to be annexed for thirty (30) days.
The secretary of the board of directors shall publish notice of the time and place of such election, in accordance with the provisions of section 34-1406, Idaho Code. The notice shall particularly describe the property to be annexed, the name of the district to which the territory is proposed to be annexed, and the terms and conditions prescribed by the board under which the property may be annexed. The notice shall designate the places in the territory where the election will be held, and shall require the voters to cast ballots which shall contain the words:

In all proceedings for inclusion or annexation hereunder, the board shall have the power to prescribe terms and conditions under which said property may be included in the district, including the condition that such property may only be annexed or included within the district if the property is also established as a water or sewer subdistrict of the district, pursuant to sections 42-3218A through 42-3218D, Idaho Code, and may be required to pay the district its pro rata share of construction costs theretofore incurred by the district pursuant to any bond issue theretofore made or otherwise; provided, however, that such terms and conditions shall be announced by the board at or before the hearing to be held pursuant to subparagraphs (a) and (b) above. Within ten (10) days of the announcement of the terms and conditions under which the property may be included the majority of the petitioners filing petitions under the provisions of subparagraphs (a) or (b) may withdraw their petitions, and no further proceedings shall thereafter be had by the board upon such petitions.
(d) All public streets, roads, highways or alleys upon or within which is situated any part of the operative system or equipment of the district and all public streets, roads, highways and alleys which abut against or touch property annexed or to be annexed to the district, to the extent they abut against or touch such property and are not included in a different district, shall be deemed to be included in the district as a part of the annexation and shall be included in the legal description and map which the district must file in the offices of the county assessor, county recorder and the state tax commission as required by section 63-215, Idaho Code; provided, however, that upon application by the district to the state tax commission, if the commission finds after consultation with the county assessor and the county recorder that exemption from the requirements of this subparagraph (d) will not unduly burden state and local tax administration, the commission by order may exempt the district from the requirements of this subparagraph (d), but the district shall be required to comply with section 63-215, Idaho Code.

For annexation to .... District.

Against annexation to .... District.

The judges of the election shall make their return thereof to the board of directors of the district, which shall canvass the returns and render a statement of the results of the election on the records of the board. If the majority of the votes cast favor annexation, the board shall enter an order annexing the property described in the notice of election and the territory shall thereupon become annexed to the district and shall thenceforth be a part of the district.

§ 42-3218A. Subdistricts — Authority to establish — Election.

The board of directors of any water or sewer district organized under the provisions of chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, may at any time, on their own motion, call an election to submit to the qualified electors of a proposed water or sewer subdistrict the question of the creation of a water or sewer subdistrict. The election shall be called, held, and conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code. The proceedings calling the election shall set forth the boundaries of the proposed water or sewer subdistrict and shall provide for the submission of the question of the creation of the water or sewer subdistrict to the qualified electors residing within the proposed boundaries of the water or sewer subdistrict. No proposition for the creation of a water or sewer subdistrict shall be determined to have carried unless the proposition shall receive a majority of the votes cast. Whenever the creation of more than one (1) water or sewer subdistrict is submitted at the same election, separate ballots and separate propositions shall be used in voting on the question of creating each water or sewer subdistrict.

§ 42-3218B. Establishment.

Whenever a proposition for the creation of a water or sewer subdistrict shall have been approved in the manner set forth in section 42-3218A, Idaho Code, the board of directors of the water or sewer district shall enter in the minutes of the board an order providing for the establishment and creation of the water or sewer subdistrict setting forth therein the legal description of the boundaries thereof, and shall designate therein a name for such water or sewer subdistrict. Within ten (10) days after the entry of the order creating a water or sewer subdistrict, the board of directors shall certify the fact of the creation of the water or sewer subdistrict to the board of county commissioners of each county in which any part of the water or sewer subdistrict is located, by the filing of a certified copy of the order of the board of directors creating and establishing the water or sewer subdistrict.

§ 42-3218C. Nature and powers.

Each water or sewer subdistrict created and established as provided in sections 42-3218A through 42-3218D, Idaho Code, shall be a political subdivision of the state of Idaho. The board of directors entering the order creating and establishing a water or sewer subdistrict shall be the governing body of all water or sewer subdistricts created by the board, and shall possess those powers as provided in chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, on behalf of the water or sewer subdistrict, including the power to order, conduct and hold all elections in water or sewer subdistricts for the purpose of incurring debt and issuing bonds pursuant to chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code.

§ 42-3218D. Indebtedness — Bond issues.

Water or sewer subdistricts may incur debt and issue bonds for the purpose of acquiring, purchasing, or improving a water or sewer site or sites, and acquiring or constructing new water or sewer facilities. The governing body of a water or sewer subdistrict may submit to the qualified electors of the water or sewer subdistrict the question of whether the governing body of the water or sewer subdistrict shall be empowered to issue negotiable bonds of the water or sewer subdistrict in an amount and for a period of time to be named in the notice of election. Notice of the bond election shall be given, the election shall be conducted and the returns thereof canvassed and the qualifications of electors voting or offering to vote shall be as provided in chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code.

§ 42-3219. Exclusion of property petitioned — Hearing — Order.

The owner or owners in fee of any real property constituting a portion of the district may file with the board a petition praying that such lands be excluded and taken from said district. Petitions shall describe the property which the petitioners desire to have excluded. Such petition must be acknowledged in the same manner and form as required in case of a conveyance of land and be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the exclusion proceedings. The secretary of the board shall cause a notice of filing of such petition to be published in the county in which said property or the major portion thereof, is located. The notice shall state the filing of such petition, the names of petitioners, description of the property mentioned in said petition, and the prayer of said petitioners; and it shall notify all persons interested to appear at the office of said board at the time named in said notice, showing cause in writing, if any they have, why said petition should not be granted. The board at the time and place mentioned in the notice, or at the time or times at which the hearing of said petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented in writing by any person showing cause as aforesaid, why the prayer of the petition should not be granted. The filing of such petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent by each and all such petitioners to the exclusion from the district of the property mentioned in the petition, or any part thereof. The board, if it deems it not for the best interests of the district that the property mentioned in the petition, or portion thereof, shall be excluded from the district, shall order that said petition be denied, but if it deems it for the best interest of the district that the property mentioned in the petition, or some portion thereof, be excluded from the district, then the board may order the property mentioned in the petition or some portion thereof, excluded from the district. Upon allowance of such petition, the board shall file a certified copy of the order of the board making such change with the clerk of the court and upon order of the court said property shall be excluded from the district.

§ 42-3219A. Exclusion and removal of lands following rejection twice by electorate of certain proposals for creation of indebtedness.

Upon rejection by the district electorate of substantially the same proposal in two (2) separate elections for the creation of indebtedness for the purpose of acquisition, construction, installation or completion of any works or other improvements or facilities or the making of any contract to carry out the purposes of the district, and after denial by the board of a petition for exclusion of property filed and heard, as provided under section 42-3219[, Idaho Code], the owners in fee, or their representatives, of real property located in the district may petition the district court of the judicial district in which the majority of the property subject of said petition is located for exclusion and removal of their lands from such water and sewer district. Such petition shall be signed by not less than fifty-one per cent (51%) of the qualified electors of the area to be excluded from the district, shall include a legal description of the real property, the subject of said petition, shall be acknowledged in the same manner and form as required in case of a conveyance of land and shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the exclusion and removal proceedings. The petitioners shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be filed with the district, and to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which said property, or the major portion thereof, is located, once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks. Such notice shall state the date of filing of such petition and the names of the petitioners, shall include a legal description of the property mentioned in said petition, shall set forth the prayer of said petitioners, and shall notify all persons interested to appear at the deisgnated [designated] court at the time stated in said notice, showing cause in writing, if any they have, why said petition should not be granted. At any time before the expiration of the time of publication, any person may file his objections to said petition. At the time and place designated in the notice, or at the time or times at which the hearing of said petition may be adjourned, the court shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto presented in writing by any person showing cause as aforesaid.

The court shall grant such petition upon finding that said proposals for the creation of indebtedness were twice rejected by the electors of the whole district, and upon the finding that said real property so designated by the petition for exclusion and removal forms a contiguous area and either has no need for water and sewage disposal services or reasonably constitutes a separate area for purposes of water and sewage disposal services.

§ 42-3219B. Exclusion and removal of lands following rejection twice by electorate of certain proposals for creation of indebtedness — Alternative procedure.

The board of directors of the district may, upon rejection by the district electorate of substantially the same proposal in two (2) separate elections (whether held prior to or after enactment of this section) for the creation of indebtedness for the purpose of acquisition, construction, installation or completion of any works or other improvement or facilities or the making of any contract to carry out the purposes of the district, petition the district court of the judicial district in which the majority of the property subject of the petition is located for exclusion and removal of lands from such water and sewer district. Such petition shall include a general description of the boundaries of the area to be excluded from the district with such certainty as to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his property is within the area to be excluded and shall be verified. The board of directors of the district, as petitioners, shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which said property, or the major portion thereof is located, once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks. Such notice shall state the date of filing of such petition, shall include a description of the boundaries of the area to be excluded from the district with such certainty as to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his property is within the area to be excluded, and shall notify all persons interested to appear at the designated court at the time stated in said notice, showing cause in writing, if any they have, why said petition should not be granted. At any time before the expiration of the time of publication, any person may file his objection to said petition. At the time and place designated in the notice, or at the time or times at which the hearing of said petition may be adjourned, the court shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto presented in writing by any person showing cause as aforesaid.

The court shall grant such petition upon finding that said proposals for the creation of indebtedness were twice rejected by the electors of the whole district, and upon the finding that said area so designated by the petition for exclusion and removal forms a contiguous area and either has no need for water or sewage disposal services or reasonably constitutes a separate area for purposes of water and sewage disposal services; or is of such location and character that water or sewage disposal services cannot be furnished to it by such water and sewer district at reasonable cost and that the withdrawal of such area will be conducive to the general welfare of the balance of the district.

The granting of such petition by the court and such exclusion of said property from the district shall not relieve such property from paying any bond indebtedness of the district existing at the time of said exclusion order against any such property so excluded, nor shall the granting of such petition and exclusion of such property relieve such property of any levy for the support of said district for the year in which it is removed.
The procedure for the exclusion and removal of lands from a water and sewer district as provided in this section shall be an alternative to the procedures provided in sections 42-3219 and 42-3219A, Idaho Code.

§ 42-3220. Liability of property included or excluded.

All real property included within, or excluded from, a district shall thereafter be subject to the levy of taxes for the payment of any indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion.

§ 42-3221. Issuance of negotiable coupon bonds — Form and terms.

To carry out the purposes of this act, and to pay the necessary and ordinary expenses of the district, the board is hereby authorized to issue negotiable coupon bonds of the district. Bonds shall bear interest, payable semi-annually, and shall be due and payable serially, either annually or semi-annually, commencing not later than three (3) years and extending not more than thirty (30) years from date. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their payment and redemption, shall be determined by the board. If the board so determines, such bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity upon payment of a premium, not exceeding three per centum (3%) of the principal thereof. Said bonds shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the chairman of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Said bonds shall be in such denominations as the board shall determine and the bonds and coupons thereto attached shall be payable to bearer. Interest coupons shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the chairman of the board.

§ 42-3222. Indebtedness of district — Submission of proposition to electorate.

Whenever any board shall, by resolution, determine that the interest of said district and the public interest or necessity demand the acquisition, construction, installation or completion of any works or other improvements or facilities, or the making of any contract with the United States or other persons or corporations, public or private, municipalities, or governmental subdivisions, to carry out the objects or purposes of said district, requiring the creation of an indebtedness that will exceed the income and revenue provided for the year, said board shall order the submission of the proposition of issuing such obligations or bonds, or creating other indebtedness to the qualified electors of the district at an election held, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, for that purpose. The declaration of public interest or necessity herein required and the provision for the holding of such election may be included within one and the same resolution, which resolution, in addition to such declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the works or improvements, as the case may be, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on such indebtedness. Such resolution shall also fix the date upon which such election shall be held and the manner of holding the same and the method of voting for or against the incurring of the proposed indebtedness. Such resolution shall also fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the election and shall designate the polling place or places and shall appoint, for each polling place from the electors of the district, the officers of such election consisting of three (3) judges, one (1) of whom shall act as clerk.

§ 42-3223. Notice of election.

The board shall prescribe the form of the notice of election, and direct the publication of the same in accordance with the provisions of sections 34-1405 and 34-1406, Idaho Code.

§ 42-3224. Conduct of election — Canvass of returns.

The election board or boards shall conduct the election in the manner prescribed by law for the holding of general elections, including chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and shall make their returns to the secretary of the district, provided that precincts shall be as provided in section 42-3207, Idaho Code. At any regular or special meeting of the board held within ten (10) days following the date of such election, the returns thereof shall be canvassed and the results thereof declared.

§ 42-3225. Effect of election — Subsequent elections.

In the event that it shall appear from said returns that two-thirds (2/3) of said qualified electors who are taxpayers of the district who shall have voted on any proposition submitted hereunder at such election voted in favor of such proposition, the district shall thereupon be authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, enter into such contract or issue and sell such bonds of the district, as the case may be, all for the purpose or purposes and object or objects provided for in the proposition submitted hereunder and in the resolution therefor, and in the amount so provided and at a rate of interest not exceeding the rate of interest recited in such resolution. Submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent election or elections called for such purpose.

§ 42-3226. Correction of faulty notices.

In any and every case where a notice is provided for in this act, if the court finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the court shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but the court shall in that case order due notice to be given, and shall continue the hearing until such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice has [had] been properly given in the first instance.

§ 42-3227. Separability.

If it should be judicially determined that any part of this act is invalid or unenforcible [unenforceable], such determination shall not affect the remaining parts, it being the intention to make this act and all its parts severable.

§ 42-3228. Budget and hearing.

A board shall adopt a budget and shall cause a public hearing to be held upon such budget, prior to certifying a tax levy to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district, or having a portion of its territory within the district.

§ 42-3229. Notice of hearing.

Notice of the budget hearing meeting shall be posted at least ten (10) full days prior to the date of said meeting in at least one (1) conspicuous place in each water and sewer district to be determined by the board; a copy of such notice shall also be published in a daily or weekly newspaper published within such water and sewer district, in one (1) issue thereof, during such ten (10) day period. The place, hour and day of such hearing shall be specified in said notice, as well as the place where such budget may be examined prior to such hearing. A full and complete copy of such proposed budget shall be published with and as a part of the publication of such notice of hearing.

§ 42-3230. Public inspection of budget — Time and place.

Such budget shall be available for public inspection from and after the date of the posting of notices of hearing as in this act provided, at such place and during such business hours as the board may direct.

§ 42-3231. Quorum of board at hearing.

A quorum of the board shall attend such hearing and explain the proposed budget and hear any and all objections thereto.

§ 42-3232. Validation of acts taken pursuant to this chapter.

All acts and proceedings heretofore taken pursuant to chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, for the organization of the district, the elections incidental thereto, the authorization, issuance, and sale of bonds of any such district, are hereby confirmed, validated and declared legally effective, including all acts and proceedings of any person, public officer, board or agency heretofore done or taken upon the question of the authorization, issuance, sale or exchange of such bonds authorized to be issued under such statutes, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority or otherwise, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities in the creation of such public body, including all election procedures incidental thereto, and in such public securities, acts and proceedings, and in such authorization, execution, sale, issuance and payment.

The provisions of this section shall not operate to confirm, validate or legalize any action or proceedings [proceeding], the legality of which is being contested or inquired into [in] any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined and shall not operate to confirm, validate or legalize any action or proceedings [proceeding] which has heretofore been determined in any legal proceeding to be illegal, void or ineffective.

Any action or proceeding contesting the validity of any action or proceeding referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be brought within thirty (30) days from the effective date of this act.

This act shall operate to supply such legislative authority as may be necessary to validate any public securities heretofore issued and any such acts and proceedings heretofore taken which the legislature could have supplied or provided for in the law under which such public securities were issued and such acts or proceedings were taken.

§ 42-3233. Merger authorized.

Two (2) or more water and/or sewer districts may vote to merge upon such terms as the districts may agree. In order to bring the matter to a vote, each board of directors, by majority vote, must independently vote to call an election for a vote to merge.

§ 42-3234. Majority vote required.

If all boards of directors of districts proposing to merge call for the election, each district shall independently hold an election, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, and if more than a majority of those voting in each election favor the merger, the merger shall occur.

§ 42-3235. Voting procedure.

Qualifications for and methods of voting, conduct of the election and canvass of the returns shall be the same as provided for the election of a director.

§ 42-3236. Ballot.

Each ballot shall have attached to it a summary of the terms of the merger, and the ballot issue shall read:

Shall ..................... and ..................... sewer and/or water districts merge into one sewer and/or water district to be known as ..................... on the summary of terms outlined.

YES
NO

§ 42-3237. Court order declaring merger.

In the event all districts voting on the issue pass the same, each board shall certify the results of the election to the district court in which most of the territory of the merged district will be. Upon satisfying itself that the election proceedings were proper in each district, the court shall enter an order creating the merged district under the terms presented to the voters. The court shall also select five (5) directors for the newly merged district from among the directors of the constituent districts recommended for such positions and shall set their terms of office.

§ 42-3238. Private community sewer system — Properties exempt from other taxation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no water district, sewer district or water and sewer district shall levy or collect any tax, any fee or any other charge of any kind related in any way to the collection or treatment of sewage by such district against any property located in such district which property is served by a private community sewer system. Said properties shall be exempt from any such tax, fee or charge. A “private community sewer system” means a system which collects and processes sewage for ten (10) or more residences, commercial or industrial facilities. The exemption provided in this section shall not apply to residences, commercial or industrial facilities served by an individual septic system. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit a charge for the delivery or furnishing of water by such district.

§ 42-3239. Dissolution of a district upon transfer of assets to municipality.

A water, sewer, or combined water and sewer district may transfer to a municipality the assets of the district and dissolve upon a determination that each of the following conditions exists:

The municipality is capable of providing all the essential functions of the district;

The municipality has agreed to assume and perform the essential functions of the district;

The municipality either has or is acquiring sufficient assets, infrastructure, and other resources to perform the essential operations of the district;

Provisions have been made for the retirement, payment or assumption of any debt, bonds, or other liabilities and obligations of the district;

Provisions have been made for the liquidation and disbursement of district assets and infrastructure not intended to be transferred to the municipality; and

Notice of the proposed transfer has been published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, including information on the petition for an election on the proposed transfer; and

An election has been held, if required pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, and the transfer has been approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the district voting on the issue.

Prior to passage of a resolution making the required determination, the district board shall hold a hearing to receive public testimony on the proposed transfer. The public hearing shall be preceded by a notice published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks preceding the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice shall state the date, time and location of the hearing and that the purpose of the hearing is to receive public testimony on the proposed transfer and the method for a petition of qualified electors of the district to be submitted requesting an election to approve the proposed transfer.

After the hearing, the district board may submit the proposed transfer to the qualified electors of the district, or shall take the matter under advisement for a period of thirty (30) days after the hearing. An election shall be held if, prior to the expiration of the thirty (30) day period, a petition signed by not less than ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of the district is submitted requesting an election on the proposed transfer. If at the end of the thirty (30) day period no petition has been submitted with the required number of signatures, the district board may proceed to adopt the resolution finding the above conditions exist and approving the transfer. An election held pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be conducted according to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, and the proposed transfer shall be approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the district voting on the issue in order for the district board to proceed to adopt a resolution approving the transfer.